Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 3 LICENSING PROCEDURES
44-10-311. Restrictions for applications for new licenses.

The state or a local licensing authority shall not receive or act upon an application for the issuance of a state or local medical marijuana business license pursuant to this article 10:

If the application for a state or local license concerns a particular location that is the same as or within one thousand feet of a location for which, within the two years immediately preceding the date of the application, the state or a local licensing authority denied an application for the same class of license due to the nature of the use or other concern related to the location;

Until it is established that the applicant is, or will be, entitled to possession of the premises for which application is made under a lease, rental agreement, or other arrangement for possession of the premises or by virtue of ownership of the premises;

For a location in an area where the cultivation, manufacture, and sale of medical marijuana as contemplated is not permitted under the applicable zoning laws of the municipality, city and county, or county;

If the building in which medical marijuana is to be sold is located within one thousand feet of a school; an alcohol or drug treatment facility; the principal campus of a college, university, or seminary; or a residential child care facility. The provisions of this section do not affect the renewal or reissuance of a license once granted or apply to licensed premises located or to be located on land owned by a municipality, nor do the provisions of this section apply to an existing licensed premises on land owned by the state or apply to a license in effect and actively doing business before said principal campus was constructed. The local licensing authority of a city and county, by rule or regulation; the governing body of a municipality, by ordinance; and the governing body of a county, by resolution, may vary the distance restrictions imposed by this subsection (1)(d)(I) for a license or may eliminate one or more types of schools, campuses, or facilities from the application of a distance restriction established by or pursuant to this subsection (1)(d)(I).

The distances referred to in this subsection (1)(d) are to be computed by direct measurement from the nearest property line of the land used for a school or campus to the nearest portion of the building in which medical marijuana is to be sold, using a route of direct pedestrian access.

In addition to the requirements of section 44-10-304 (2), the local licensing authority shall consider the evidence and make a specific finding of fact as to whether the building in which the medical marijuana is to be sold is located within any distance restrictions established by or pursuant to this subsection (1)(d).

The state licensing authority shall not approve an application for the issuance of a state retail marijuana business license pursuant to this article 10 until it is established that the applicant is, or will be, entitled to possession of the premises for which application is made under a lease, rental agreement, or other arrangement for possession of the premises or by virtue of ownership of the premises.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2872, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-308 and 44-12-307 as they existed prior to 2020.

44-10-312. Transfer of ownership.

A state or local license granted under the provisions of this article 10 is not transferable except as provided in this section, but this section does not prevent a change of location as provided in section 44-10-313 (13).

For a transfer of ownership involving a controlling beneficial owner, a license holder shall apply to the state and local licensing authorities on forms prepared and furnished by the state licensing authority. In determining whether to permit a transfer of ownership, the state and local licensing authorities shall consider only the requirements of this article 10, any rules promulgated by the state licensing authority, and any other local restrictions. The local licensing authority or local jurisdiction may hold a hearing on the application for transfer of ownership. The local licensing authority or local jurisdiction shall not hold a hearing pursuant to this subsection (2) until the local licensing authority or local jurisdiction has posted a notice of hearing in the manner described in section 44-10-303 (2) on the licensed premises for a period of ten days and has provided notice of the hearing to the applicant at least ten days prior to the hearing. Any transfer of ownership hearing by the state licensing authority must be held in compliance with the requirements specified in section 44-10-303.

For a transfer of ownership involving a passive beneficial owner, the license holder shall notify the state licensing authority on forms prepared and furnished by the state licensing authority within forty-five days to the extent disclosure is required by section 44-10-309.

A person that becomes a controlling beneficial owner of a publicly traded corporation that is a medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business or that becomes a beneficial owner, through direct or indirect ownership of a controlling beneficial owner, of ten percent or more of a medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business that is a publicly traded corporation must disclose the information required by section 44-10-309 and apply to the state licensing authority for a finding of suitability or exemption from a finding of suitability pursuant to section 44-10-310 within forty-five days after becoming such a controlling beneficial owner. A medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business shall notify each person that is subject to this subsection (4) of its requirements as soon as the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business becomes aware of the beneficial ownership triggering the requirement, provided that the obligations of the person subject to this subsection (4) are independent of, and unaffected by, the medical marijuana business's or retail marijuana business's failure to give the notice.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2873, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-309 and 44-12-308 as they existed prior to 2020.

44-10-313. Licensing in general - rules.

This article 10 authorizes a county, municipality, or city and county to prohibit the operation of a medical marijuana business and to enact reasonable regulations or other restrictions applicable to medical marijuana businesses based on local government zoning, health, safety, and public welfare laws for the distribution of medical marijuana that are more restrictive than this article 10.

Local jurisdictions are authorized to adopt and enforce regulations for retail marijuana businesses that are at least as restrictive as the provisions of this article 10 and any rule promulgated pursuant to this article 10.

A medical marijuana business may not operate until it has been licensed by the local licensing authority and the state licensing authority pursuant to this article 10. If the state licensing authority issues the applicant a state license and the local licensing authority subsequently denies the applicant a license, the state licensing authority shall consider the local licensing authority denial as a basis for the revocation of the state-issued license. In connection with a license, the applicant shall provide a complete and accurate list of all controlling beneficial owners, passive beneficial owners to the extent disclosure is required by section 44-10-309, and employees who manage, own, or are otherwise substantially associated with the operation and shall provide a complete and accurate application as required by the state licensing authority.

A retail marijuana business may not operate until it is licensed by the state licensing authority pursuant to this article 10 and approved by the local jurisdiction. If an application is denied by the local licensing authority, the state licensing authority shall revoke the state-issued license. In connection with a license, the applicant shall provide a complete and accurate application as required by the state licensing authority.

A medical marijuana business that is not a publicly traded corporation shall notify the state licensing authority in writing within ten days after a controlling beneficial owner, passive beneficial owner, or manager ceases to work at, manage, own, or otherwise be associated with the operation. The controlling beneficial owner, passive beneficial owner, or manager shall surrender to the state licensing authority any identification card that may have been issued by the state licensing authority on or before the date of the notification.

A medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business that is not a publicly traded corporation shall notify the state licensing authority in writing of the name, address, and date of birth of a controlling beneficial owner, passive beneficial owner, or manager before the new controlling beneficial owner, passive beneficial owner, or manager begins managing or associating with the operation. Any controlling beneficial owner, passive beneficial owner, manager, or employee must pass a fingerprint-based criminal history record check as required by the state licensing authority and obtain the required identification prior to being associated with, managing, owning, or working at the operation.

A medical marijuana business shall not acquire, possess, cultivate, deliver, transfer, transport, supply, or dispense marijuana for any purpose except to assist patients, as defined by section 14 (1) of article XVIII of the state constitution.

A retail marijuana business shall not acquire, possess, cultivate, deliver, transfer, transport, supply, or dispense marijuana for any purpose except as authorized by section 16 of article XVIII of the state constitution and this article 10.

All employee licenses granted pursuant to this article 10 are valid for a period not to exceed two years after the date of issuance unless revoked or suspended pursuant to this article 10 or the rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10.

All regulated marijuana business licenses and licenses granted to a controlling beneficial owner pursuant to this article 10 are valid for a period of one year after the date of issuance unless revoked or suspended pursuant to this article 10 or the rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10.

Before granting a local or state license, the respective licensing authority may consider, except where this article 10 specifically provides otherwise, the requirements of this article 10 and any rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10, and all other reasonable restrictions that are or may be placed upon the licensee by the licensing authority. With respect to a second or additional license for the same medical marijuana business licensee or the same owner of another licensed medical marijuana business pursuant to this article 10, each licensing authority shall consider the effect on competition of granting or denying the additional licenses to such licensee and shall not approve an application for a second or additional license that would have the effect of restraining competition.

Each license issued under this article 10 is separate and distinct. It is unlawful for a person to exercise any of the privileges granted under a license other than the license that the person holds or for a licensee to allow any other person to exercise the privileges granted under the licensee's license. A separate license is required for each specific business or business entity and each geographical location.

At all times, a licensee shall possess and maintain possession of the premises for which the license is issued by ownership, lease, rental, or other arrangement for possession of the premises.

The licenses provided pursuant to this article 10 must specify the date of issuance, the period of licensure, the name of the licensee, and the premises licensed. The licensee shall conspicuously place the license at all times on the licensed premises.

A local licensing authority shall not transfer location of or renew a license to sell medical marijuana until the applicant for the license provides verification that a license was issued and granted by the state licensing authority for the previous license term. The state licensing authority shall not transfer location of or renew a state license until the applicant provides verification that a license was issued and granted by the local licensing authority for the previous license term.

In computing any period of time prescribed by this article 10, the day of the act, event, or default from which the designated period of time begins to run is not included. Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are counted as any other day.

Except for a publicly traded corporation, a medical marijuana business licensee shall report each transfer or change of financial interest in the license to the state and local licensing authorities thirty days prior to any transfer or change pursuant to section 44-10-312. Except for a publicly traded corporation, a report is required for transfers of an owner's interest of any entity regardless of size.

Except for a publicly traded corporation, a retail marijuana business licensee shall report each transfer or change of financial interest in the license to the state and local licensing authorities and receive approval prior to any transfer or change pursuant to section 44-10-312. Except for a publicly traded corporation, a report is required for transfers of an owner's interest of any entity regardless of size.

Each licensee shall manage the licensed premises himself or herself or employ a separate and distinct manager on the premises and shall report the name of the manager to the state and local licensing authorities. The licensee shall report any change in manager to the state and local licensing authorities prior to the change pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

A licensee may move the permanent location to any other place in Colorado once permission to do so is granted by the state and local licensing authorities or local jurisdiction provided for in this article 10. Upon receipt of an application for change of location, the state licensing authority shall, within seven days, submit a copy of the application to the local licensing authority or local jurisdiction to determine whether the transfer complies with all local restrictions on change of location.

In permitting a change of location, the state and local licensing authorities or local jurisdiction shall consider all reasonable restrictions that are or may be placed upon the new location by the governing board or local licensing authority of the municipality, city and county, or county, and any such change in location must be in accordance with all requirements of this article 10 and rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10.

A medical marijuana cultivation facility or retail marijuana cultivation facility that has obtained an approved change of location from the state licensing authority may operate one license at two geographical locations for the purpose of transitioning operations from one location to another if:

The total plants cultivated at both locations do not exceed any plant count limit imposed on the license by this article 10 and any rules promulgated by the state licensing authority;

The licensed premises of both geographical locations comply with all surveillance, security, and inventory tracking requirements imposed by this article 10 and any rules promulgated by the state licensing authority;

Both the transferring location and the receiving location track all plants virtually in transition in the seed-to-sale tracking system to ensure proper tracking for taxation and tracking purposes;

Operation at both geographical locations does not exceed one hundred eighty days, unless for good cause shown, the one-hundred-eighty-day deadline may be extended for an additional one hundred twenty days; and

The medical marijuana cultivation facility or retail marijuana cultivation facility licensee obtains the proper state permit and local permit or license. If the change of location is within the same local jurisdiction, the licensee must first obtain a transition permit from the state licensing authority and, if required by the local jurisdiction, a transition permit or other form of approval from the local licensing authority or local jurisdiction. If the change of location is to a different local jurisdiction, the licensee must first obtain a license from the local licensing authority or local jurisdiction where it intends to locate, a transition permit from the state licensing authority, and, if required by the local jurisdiction, a transition permit or other form of approval from the local licensing authority or local jurisdiction for the local jurisdiction where it intends to locate.

Conduct at either location may be the basis for fine, suspension, revocation, or other sanction against the license.

On or after January 1, 2023, a person may operate a licensed medical marijuana business and a licensed retail marijuana business at the same location pursuant to this subsection (14) and rules promulgated by the state licensing authority if the local licensing authority and local jurisdiction where the businesses are located allow licensed medical marijuana and licensed retail marijuana businesses to be operated at the same location.

Except as provided in subsection (14)(b)(II) of this section, if a licensed medical marijuana store and a licensed retail marijuana store operate at the same location, each store shall maintain separate licensed premises and separate business operations, including separate entrances and exits, inventory, point of sale operations, and record keeping.

The state licensing authority shall adopt rules concerning whether aspects of the licensed premises and business operations may be combined when a licensed medical marijuana store that operates at the same location as a licensed retail marijuana store sells medical marijuana only to persons twenty-one years of age or older. The rules must address whether to allow single entrances and exits and virtual separation of inventory.

A licensed medical marijuana cultivation facility and a licensed retail marijuana cultivation facility located at the same location must maintain either physical or virtual separation of the two facilities and the plants and inventory of the two facilities.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2873, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(6) amended, (HB 20-1080), ch. 81, p. 329, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(14) added, (HB 22-1037), ch. 78, p. 390, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-310 and 44-12-309 as they existed prior to 2020.

44-10-314. License renewal.

Ninety days prior to the expiration date of an existing medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business license, the state licensing authority shall notify the licensee of the expiration date by first-class mail at the licensee's address of record with the state licensing authority. A licensee must apply for the renewal of an existing license to the local licensing authority within the time frame required by local ordinance or regulation and to the state licensing authority prior to the expiration of the license. The licensee shall provide the state licensing authority with information establishing that the application complies with all local requirements for the renewal of a license. If a licensee submits a timely and sufficient renewal application, the licensee may continue to operate until the application is finally acted upon by the state licensing authority. The local licensing authority may hold a hearing on the application for renewal of a medical marijuana business license only if the licensee has had complaints filed against it, has a history of violations, or there are allegations against the licensee that would constitute good cause. The local licensing authority shall not hold a renewal hearing provided for by this subsection (1) for a medical marijuana store until it has posted a notice of hearing on the licensed medical marijuana store premises in the manner described in section 44-10-303 (2) for a period of ten days and provided notice to the applicant at least ten days prior to the hearing. The local licensing authority may refuse to renew any license for good cause, subject to judicial review.

The state licensing authority may require an additional fingerprint request when there is a demonstrated investigative need.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2877, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-311 (1) and (2) and 44-12-310 (1) as they existed prior to 2020.

44-10-315. Inactive licenses.

The state or local licensing authority, in its discretion, may revoke or elect not to renew any license if it determines that the licensed premises have been inactive, without good cause, for at least one year.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2879, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-312 and 44-12-311 as they existed prior to 2020.

44-10-316. Unlawful financial assistance.

The state licensing authority, by rule, shall require a complete disclosure pursuant to section 44-10-309 in connection with each license issued under this article 10.

This section is intended to prohibit and prevent the control of the outlets for the sale of regulated marijuana and regulated marijuana products by a person or party other than the persons licensed pursuant to the provisions of this article 10.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2879, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-313 and 44-12-312 as they existed prior to 2020.